tests/verbs-aor.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../sah.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../sah.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "Aorist front vowels, consonant stem": 
    көр<v><tv><aor><p1><sg> : көрөбүн
    көр<v><tv><aor><p2><sg> : көрөҕүн
    көр<v><tv><aor><p3><sg> : көрөр
    көр<v><tv><aor><p1><pl> : көрөбүт
    көр<v><tv><aor><p2><pl> : көрөҕүт
    көр<v><tv><aor><p3><pl> : көрөллөр

  "Aorist negative back vowels, consonant stem":
    көр<v><tv><neg><aor><p1><sg> : көрбөппүн
    көр<v><tv><neg><aor><p2><sg> : көрбөккүн
    көр<v><tv><neg><aor><p3><sg> : көрбөт
    көр<v><tv><neg><aor><p1><pl> : көрбөппүт
    көр<v><tv><neg><aor><p2><pl> : көрбөккүт
    көр<v><tv><neg><aor><p3><pl> : көрбөттөр

  "Aorist back vowels, consonant stem": 
    олор<v><iv><aor><p1><sg> : олоробун
    олор<v><iv><aor><p2><sg> : олороҕун
    олор<v><iv><aor><p3><sg> : олорор
    олор<v><iv><aor><p1><pl> : олоробут
    олор<v><iv><aor><p2><pl> : олороҕут
    олор<v><iv><aor><p3><pl> : олороллор

  "Aorist negative back vowels, consonant stem":
    олор<v><iv><neg><aor><p1><sg> : олорбоппун
    олор<v><iv><neg><aor><p2><sg> : олорбоккун
    олор<v><iv><neg><aor><p3><sg> : олорбот
    олор<v><iv><neg><aor><p1><pl> : олорбоппут
    олор<v><iv><neg><aor><p2><pl> : олорбоккут
    олор<v><iv><neg><aor><p3><pl> : олорботтор

  "Aorist front vowel, vowel stem":
    диэ<v><tv><aor><p1><sg> : диибин
    диэ<v><tv><aor><p2><sg> : диигин
    диэ<v><tv><aor><p3><sg> : диир
    диэ<v><tv><aor><p3><pl> : дииллэр

  "Aorist negative front vowel, vowel stem":
    диэ<v><tv><neg><aor><p3><sg> : диэбэт

  "Aorist back vowel, vowel stem":
    сатаа<v><tv><aor><p1><sg> : сатыыбын
    сатаа<v><tv><aor><p3><sg> : сатыыр
    сатаа<v><tv><aor><p3><pl> : сатыыллар

  "Aorist round vowel stems":
    төрөө<v><iv><aor><p3><sg> : төрүүр
    өйдөө<v><tv><aor><p3><sg> : өйдүүр
    өйдөө<v><tv><aor><p3><pl> : өйдүүллэр
    холоо<v><iv><aor><p3><sg> : холуур

  "Aorist round + unround vowel stems":
    үөскээ<v><iv><aor><p3><sg> : үөскүүр
    туораа<v><iv><aor><p3><sg> : туоруур
    бултаа<v><tv><aor><p3><sg> : бултуур

  "Aorist negative back vowel, vowel stem":
    сатаа<v><tv><neg><aor><p3><sg> : сатаабат

  "Verbs with epenthetic vowel and no additional alternations":
    умун<v><tv><aor><p3><sg> : умнар
    умун<v><tv><ifi><p1><sg> : умуннум
    төнүн<v><iv><aor><p3><sg> : төннөр
    төнүн<v><iv><ifi><p1><sg> : төнүннүм 

  "Verbs with epenthetic vowel and simple desonorisation or assimilation issues":
    үтүгүн<v><tv><aor><p3><sg> : үтүктэр
    үтүгүн<v><tv><ifi><p1><sg> : үтүгүннүм
    эбилин<v><iv><aor><p3><sg> : эбиллэр
    эбилин<v><iv><ifi><p1><sg> : эбилинним
    сайын<v><iv><aor><p3><sg> : сайдар
    сайын<v><iv><ifi><p1><sg> : сайынным
    бэрилин<v><iv><aor><p3><sg> : бэриллэр
    бэрилин<v><iv><ifi><p1><sg> : бэрилинним
    иһилин<v><iv><aor><p3><sg> : иһиллэр
    иһилин<v><iv><ifi><p1><sg> : иһилинним
    талылын<v><iv><aor><p3><sg> : талыллар
    талылын<v><iv><ifi><p1><sg> : талылынным
    кытын<v><iv><aor><p3><sg> : кыттар
    кытын<v><iv><ifi><p1><sg> : кытынным
    тутун<v><tv><aor><p3><pl> : тутталлар

  "Verbs with epenthetic vowel and с/һ alternation":
    уһун<v><iv><aor><p3><sg> : устар
    уһун<v><iv><ifi><p1><sg> : уһуннум
    иһит<v><tv><aor><p3><sg> : истэр
    иһит<v><tv><aor><p3><pl> : истэллэр
    иһит<v><tv><ifi><p1><sg> : иһиттим
    сыһын<v><iv><aor><p3><sg> : сыстар
    сыһын<v><iv><ifi><p1><sg> : сыһынным

  "Verbs with epenthetic vowel and х/ҕ alternation":
    таҕыс<v><iv><aor><p3><sg> : тахсар
    таҕыс<v><iv><ifi><p1><sg> : таҕыстым
    таҕыс<v><iv><past><p3><sg> : тахсыбыта
    оҕус<v><tv><aor><p3><sg> : охсор
    оҕус<v><tv><ifi><p1><sg> : оҕустум
    араҕыс<v><iv><aor><p3><sg> : арахсар
    араҕыс<v><iv><ifi><p1><sg> : араҕыстым

  "Verbs with epenthetic vowel and р/л alternation":
    сырыт<v><iv><aor><p3><sg> : сылдьар
    сырыт<v><iv><ifi><p1><sg> : сырыттым
    ыарый<v><iv><aor><p3><sg> : ыалдьар
    ыарый<v><iv><ifi><p1><sg> : ыарыйдым

  "Verbs with voicing of final coronals":
    орт<v><iv><aor><p3><sg> : ордор
    орт<v><iv><ifi><p1><sg> : ортум
    орт<v><iv><ifi><p3><sg> : орто
    тарт<v><tv><aor><p3><sg> : тардар
    тарт<v><tv><ifi><p1><sg> : тартым
    тарт<v><tv><ifi><p3><sg> : тарта
    тириэрт<v><tv><aor><p3><sg> : тириэрдэр
    тириэрт<v><tv><ifi><p1><sg> : тириэртим
    тириэрт<v><tv><ifi><p3><sg> : тириэртэ
